Alaska, session 34, SB257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 14.16.200(b) is amended to read: 04 (b) Costs that may be claimed by a district for reimbursement under (a) of this 05 section are 06 (1) one round trip on the least expensive means of transportation 07 between the student's community of residence and the school during the school year if 08 the district expends money for the trip; and 09 (2) a per-pupil monthly stipend to cover room and board expenses as 10 determined by the department on a regional basis and not to exceed [THE 11 FOLLOWING AMOUNTS]: 12 (A) for the Southeast Region (Region I), the amount of the 13 base student allocation set out in AS 14.17.470 multiplied by 37 percent 14 [$1,230]; 15 (B) for the Southcentral Region (Region II), the amount of the 01 base student allocation set out in AS 14.17.470 multiplied by 36 percent 02 [$1,200]; 03 (C) for the Interior Region (Region III), the amount of the 04 base student allocation set out in AS 14.17.470 multiplied by 44 percent 05 [$1,452]; 06 (D) for the Southwest Region (Region IV), the amount of the 07 base student allocation set out in AS 14.17.470 multiplied by 45 percent 08 [$1,509]; 09 (E) for the Northern Remote Region (Region V), the amount 10 of the base student allocation set out in AS 14.17.470 multiplied by 53 11 percent [$1,776]. 12 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 13 read: 14 RETROACTIVITY. This Act is retroactive to July 1, 2025. 15 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.